ru: Масштаб игрушечной еды: Масштаб для кукол (маленький); Масштаб для кукольного домика (мини); Увеличенный (для малышей); Масштаб для игрушечной кухни (стандартный); Другое
lt-LT: Žaislinio maisto dydžio mastelis: Lėlės dydžio (mažas); Lėlių namelio dydžio (mini); Padidintas (mažyliams); Žaislinės virtuvės dydžio (standartinis); Kita
bg-BG: Мащаб на размера на храната за игра: Мащаб за кукли (малък); Мащаб за куклени къщи (мини); Уголемен размер (за малки деца); Мащаб за детски кухни (стандартен); Друго
sl-SI: Merilo velikosti igrače hrane: Velikost za lutke (majhno); Velikost za hišice za lutke (mini); Izjemno veliko (za malčke); Velikost za otroške kuhinje (standardno); Drugo
el: Κλίμακα μεγέθους των παιχνιδιών τροφίμων: Κλίμακα κούκλας (μικρό); Κλίμακα κουκλόσπιτου (μίνι); Υπερμέγεθες (για νήπια); Κλίμακα κουζίνας παιχνιδιού (τυπικό); Άλλο
ro-RO: Scara de mărime a alimentelor de jucărie: Scară de păpușă (mică); Scară de casă de păpuși (mini); Supradimensionat (copii mici); Scară de bucătărie de jucărie (standard); Altele
es: Escala de tamaño de la comida de juguete: Escala de muñeca (pequeña); Escala de casa de muñecas (mini); Extragrande (niños pequeños); Escala de cocina de juguete (estándar); Otro
nb: Størrelsesskala for lekemat: Dukkestørrelse (liten); Dukkehusstørrelse (mini); Overdimensjonert (småbarn); Lekekjøkkenstørrelse (standard); Annet
it: Scala di dimensioni del cibo giocattolo: Scala da bambola (piccola); Scala da casa delle bambole (mini); Oversize (bambini piccoli); Scala per cucina giocattolo (standard); Altro
hr-HR: Igrajte vagu za veličinu hrane: Veličina za lutke (malo); Veličina za kućicu za lutke (mini); Predimenzionirano (za malu djecu); Veličina za dječju kuhinju (standardno); Ostalo
zh-CN: 过家家食物玩具比例: 玩偶比例（小号）; 玩具屋比例（迷你）; 大号（幼童）; 玩具厨房比例（标准）; 其他
nl: Speelgoedeten maatschaal: Poppenschaal (klein); Poppenhuisschaal (mini); Oversized (peuter); Speelkeukenschaal (standaard); Overig
ja: おままごと用の食品のサイズ比較: 人形スケール (スモール); ドールハウススケール (ミニ); オーバーサイズ (幼児向け); おままごとキッチンスケール (スタンダード); その他
sk-SK: Mierka hračkárskych potravín: Mierka pre bábiky (malá); Mierka pre domčeky pre bábiky (mini); Nadrozmerná (pre batoľatá); Mierka do detskej kuchynky (štandardná); Iné
hu: Játékétel méretaránya: Babaméret (kicsi); Babaházméret (mini); Túlméretezett (tipegő); Játékkonyhaméret (szabványos); Egyéb
da: Legemadens skala: Dukkestørrelse (lille); Dukkehusstørrelse (mini); Overdimensioneret (småbørn); Legekøkkenstørrelse (standard); Andet
de: Größenmaßstab der Spiellebensmittel: Puppenmaßstab (klein); Puppenhausmaßstab (Mini); Übergroß (Kleinkinder); Spielküchenmaßstab (Standard); Sonstige
th: เล่นอาหารขนาดขยายสเกล: สเกลตุ๊กตา (เล็ก); สเกลบ้านตุ๊กตา (จิ๋ว); ขนาดใหญ่พิเศษ (เด็กวัยหัดเดิน); สเกลชุดครัวของเล่น (มาตรฐาน); อื่นๆ
vi: Thang đo kích thước đồ chơi thức ăn: Tỉ lệ búp bê (nhỏ); Tỉ lệ nhà búp bê (mini); Kích thước lớn (trẻ mới biết đi); Tỉ lệ bếp đồ chơi (tiêu chuẩn); Khác
sv: Storleksskala för lekmat: Dockskala (liten); Dockhusskala (mini); Överdimensionerad (småbarn); Leksaksköksskala (standard); Övrigt
ko: 장난감 음식 크기 비율: 인형 스케일(소형); 인형의 집 스케일(미니); 오버사이즈(유아용); 플레이 키친 스케일(표준); 기타
fr: Échelle de taille des aliments factices: Échelle poupée (petit); Échelle maison de poupée (mini); Surdimensionné (tout-petits); Échelle cuisine pour enfant (standard); Autre
fi: Leikkiruoan mittakaava: Nukkekoko (pieni); Nukkekotikoko (mini); Ylisuuri (taapero); Leikkikeittiökoko (vakio); Muu
tr: Oyun yiyecek ölçek oranı: Oyuncak bebek ölçeği (küçük); Oyuncak bebek evi ölçeği (mini); Büyük boy (yürümeye başlayan çocuk); Oyuncak mutfak ölçeği (standart); Diğer
pt-PT: Comida de brincar expansão: Escala de boneca (pequeno); Escala de casa de bonecas (mini); Tamanho grande (criança); Escala de cozinha de brincar (padrão); Outro
zh-TW: 玩具食物尺寸比例: 娃娃比例 (小); 娃娃屋比例 (迷你); 超大號 (幼兒); 玩具廚房比例 (標準); 其他
en: Play food size scale: Doll scale (small); Dollhouse scale (mini); Oversized (toddler); Play kitchen scale (standard); Other
pt-BR: Comidinha de brinquedo escala de tamanho: Escala de boneca (pequena); Escala de casa de bonecas (mini); Superdimensionado (bebê); Escala de cozinha de brinquedo (padrão); Outro
cs: Měřítko velikosti herního jídla: V měřítku pro panenky (malé); V měřítku pro domečky pro panenky (mini); Nadměrná velikost (pro batolata); V měřítku do dětské kuchyňky (standardní); Jiné
pl: Skala rozmiaru zabawkowego jedzenia: W skali lalki (małe); W skali domku dla lalek (mini); Duże (dla maluchów); Skala kuchni do zabawy (standardowa); Inna